District of Columbia statutes.
21-1206

Fees.

The Mayor is authorized to charge a registration fee to applicants certified as a trained medication employee.

History

Oct. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 13-38, § 1202(e), 46 DCR 6373

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 2 (e) of D.C. Law 13-32 added this section pertaining to fees.
Section 4 (b) of D.C. Law 13-32 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Use of Trained Employees to Administer Medication Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-73, May 26, 1999, 46 DCR 5166).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1202(e) of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).